test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-namdasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
#     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: намдвэхэ”нани
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: намдвэхэтани’
#     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: намдвэхэтани
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: намдвы”манани’
#     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: намдвы”манани
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: намдвэри’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: намдвэмди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: намдвэнди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: намдвэхэнди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: намдвэхэнанди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: намдвэхэданди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: намдвэвнанди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxDu2: намдвэхэюди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxDu2: намдвэхэюди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxDu2: намдвэхэюти’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: намдвыди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: намдвыди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: намдвыти’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: намдвэхэти’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: намдвэхэ”нати’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: намдвэхэтати’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: намдвы”манати’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: намдвэди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: намдвэмди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: намдвэнди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: намдвэхэнди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: намдвэхэнанди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: намдвэхэданди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: намдвэвнанди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxDu3: намдвэхэюди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxDu3: намдвэхэюди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxDu3: намдвэхэюти’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: намдвыди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: намдвыди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: намдвыти’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: намдвэхэти’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: намдвэхэ”нати’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: намдвэхэтати’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: намдвы”манати’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: намдвэва”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: намдвэва”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: намдвэна”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: намдвэхэна”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: намдвэхэнана”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: намдвэхэдана”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: намдвэвнана”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxPl1: намдвэхэюна”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxPl1: намдвэхэюна”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxPl1: намдвэхэюна”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: намдвына”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: намдвына”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: намдвы”на”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: намдвэхэ”на”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: намдвэхэ”нана”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: намдвэхэтана”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: намдвы”манана”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: намдвэра”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: намдвэмда”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: намдвэнда”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: намдвэхэнда”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: намдвэхэнанда”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: намдвэхэданда”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: намдвэвнанда”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxPl2: намдвэхэюда”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxPl2: намдвэхэюда”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxPl2: намдвэхэюта”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: намдвыда”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: намдвыда”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: намдвыта”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: намдвэхэта”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: намдвэхэ”ната”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: намдвэхэтата”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: намдвы”маната”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: намдвэдо’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: намдвэмдо’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: намдвэндо’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: намдвэхэндо’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: намдвэхэнандо’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: намдвэхэдандо’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: намдвэвнандо’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Nom+PxPl3: намдвэхэюдо’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Acc+PxPl3: намдвэхэюдо’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Du+Gen+PxPl3: намдвэхэюто’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: намдвыдо’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: намдвыдо’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: намдвыто’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: намдвэхэто’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: намдвэхэ”нато’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: намдвэхэтато’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: намдвы”манато’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Abs: намдвэд
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [намдвэдав, намдвэдув, намдвэдами, намдвэдми]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [намдвэдав, намдвэдув, намдвэдами, намдвэдми]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [намдвэдан, намдвэдани, намдвэдни]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: намдвэдар
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: намдвэдамд
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: намдвэданд
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [намдвэдада, намдвэдда]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: намдвэдамда
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: намдвэданда
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [намдвэдами’, намдвэдми’]
#     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [намдвэдами, намдвэдми]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [намдвэдами’, намдвэдми’]
#     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [намдвэдами, намдвэдми]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [намдвэдани’, намдвэдни’]
#     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [намдвэдани, намдвэдни]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [намдвэдари’, намдвэдри’]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: намдвэдамди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: намдвэданди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [намдвэдади’, намдвэдди’]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: намдвэдамди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: намдвэданди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [намдвэдава”, намдвэдва”]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [намдвэдава”, намдвэдва”]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [намдвэдана”, намдвэдна”]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [намдвэдара”, намдвэдра”]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: намдвэдамда”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: намдвэданда”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [намдвэдадо’, намдвэддо’]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: намдвэдамдо’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: намдвэдандо’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg1: намдвэдм’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg2: намдвэн
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScSg3: намдвы
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu1: намдвэни’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu2: намдвэди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScDu3: намдвэхэ’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl1: намдвэва”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl2: намдвэда”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Aor+ScPl3: намдвы”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg1: намдвэдамзь
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg2: намдвэнась
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScSg3: [намдвысь, намдвэсь]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu1: намдвэнинзь
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu2: намдвэдинзь
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScDu3: намдвэхэнзь
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl1: намдвэваць
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl2: намдвэдаць
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Abs+Prt1+ScPl3: [намдвыць, намдвэць]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg1: намдвэв
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg2: намдвэр
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxSg3: намдвэда
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu1: намдвэми’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu2: намдвэри’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxDu3: намдвэди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl1: намдвэва”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl2: намдвэра”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Aor+PxPl3: намдвэдо’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg1: намдвэвась
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg2: намдвэрась
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxSg3: намдвэдась
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu1: намдвэминзь
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu2: намдвэринзь
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxDu3: намдвэдинзь
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl1: намдвэваць
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl2: намдвэраць
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Sg+Prt1+PxPl3: намдвэдонзь
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg1: намдвэхэюн
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg2: намдвэхэюд
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxSg3: намдвэхэюда
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu1: намдвэхэюни’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu2: намдвэхэюди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxDu3: намдвэхэюди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl1: намдвэхэюна”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl2: намдвэхэюда”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Aor+PxPl3: намдвэхэюдо’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg1: намдвэхэюнась
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg2: намдвэхэюдась
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxSg3: намдвэхэюдась
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu1: намдвэхэюнинзь
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu2: намдвэхэюдинзь
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxDu3: намдвэхэюдинзь
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl1: намдвэхэюнаць
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl2: намдвэхэюдаць
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Du+Prt1+PxPl3: намдвэхэюдонзь
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg1: намдвын
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg2: намдвыд
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxSg3: намдвыда
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu1: намдвыни’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu2: намдвыди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxDu3: намдвыди’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl1: намдвына”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl2: намдвыда”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Aor+PxPl3: намдвыдо’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg1: намдвынась
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg2: намдвыдась
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxSg3: намдвыдась
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu1: намдвынинзь
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu2: намдвыдинзь
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxDu3: намдвыдинзь
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl1: намдвынаць
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl2: намдвыдаць
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Der/Pr+Pl+Prt1+PxPl3: намдвыдонзь
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Tra: намдвэӈэ
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Car: намдвэси”
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Equ: намдвэдрем’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcPrf+Equ+Lat: намдвэдрев’
     намдась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Nom+Abs: [намдавнда, намдувнда]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Acc+Abs: [намдавндам’, намдувндам’]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Gen+Abs: [намдавнда’, намдувнда’]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Dat+Abs: [намдавндан’, намдувндан’]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Loc+Abs: [намдавндахана, намдувндахана]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Abl+Abs: [намдавндахад, намдувндахад]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcFut+Sg+Pros+Abs: [намдавндавна, намдувндавна]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcFut+Du+Nom+Abs: [намдавндаха’, намдувндаха’]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcFut+Du+Acc+Abs: [намдавндаха’, намдувндаха’]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcFut+Du+Gen+Abs: [намдавндаха’, намдувндаха’]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Nom+Abs: [намдавнда”, намдувнда”]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Acc+Abs: [намдавнди, намдувнди]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Gen+Abs: [намдавнди”, намдувнди”]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Dat+Abs: [намдавндаха”, намдувндаха”]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Loc+Abs: [намдавндаха”на, намдувндаха”на]
     намдась+V+TV+PrcFut+Pl+Abl+Abs: [намдавндахат, намдувндахат]
